Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4172.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 from the funds indicated in this part. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 500,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 500,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 500,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 500,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 500,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 500,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Avian influenza testing $ 500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 500,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 500,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2024-2025 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $500,000.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for H5N1 avian influenza testing must be used by the department for all of the following: (a) Testing facilities, backyard flocks, dead birds found in public spaces, and infected birds and their droppings for H5N1 avian influenza including obtaining respiratory samples, serological tests, and environmental samples. (b) Sequencing and subtyping of positive H5N1 tests following appropriate protocols from the United States Food and Drug Administration, the Environmental Protection Agency, and other 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 public health authorities to gain detailed information about specific strains, including genetic lineage and potential pathogenicity, which are crucial for pandemic preparedness and outbreak response. (c) Disseminating sequencing and subtyping data to the public for monitoring the spread of H5N1, identifying potential pandemic threats, and informing public health response strategies. (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for avian influenza testing are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to test facilities, backyard flocks, dead birds found in public spaces, and infected birds and their droppings for H5N1 avian influenza to safeguard preparedness and outbreak response. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $500,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029.